District of Columbia statutes.
3-410

Appeal procedures.

Any person aggrieved by any final decision or order of the Mayor denying, suspending, or revoking any license or renewal of a license issued or applied for under this chapter may obtain a review of the decision pursuant to § 2-510.

May 22, 1984, D.C. Law 5-84, § 11, 31 DCR 1815
1981 Ed., § 2-2810.